src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON kv31 ! systir
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
       +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>ir  DF_N_SGf_S  ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:rina  FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ur    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:rini  FemObl_Flag ;
       +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ur  DF_G_SGf_S  ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:%>rar DF_NA_PLf   ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>rar DF_NA_PLf   ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>ru  DF_D_PL     ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ra  DF_G_PL     ;
       !
LEXICON kv32_1 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** byrða
 kv1e	  ;
 kv_flt32 ;      
       !
LEXICON kv32 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** mýri
  kv32e    ;
  kv_flt32 ;
!
LEXICON kv32e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>i       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>i       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ina     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ini     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt32
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>arnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>arnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>unum  FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>anna  FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv33e/h24e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
h24e/kv33e ;
!
LEXICON h24e/kv33e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
   h24e ;
:i kv33e ;
!
LEXICON kv33 ! gleði
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv33e    ;
  kv_flt33 ;
!
LEXICON kv33e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef+Err/Orth:s FemObl_Flag ; ! Sso
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>n    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>na   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ni   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>nnar FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt33
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>r    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>r    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>rnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>rnar FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv34 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kraft
  kv34e    ;
  kv_flt34 ;
!
LEXICON kv34e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt34
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv35
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ong          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ong          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ong          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:eingjar      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:ongjar       FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:eingin       FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:eingina      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:eingini      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ongin        FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ongina       FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ongini       FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:eingjarinnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:ongjarinnar  FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:eingir       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:eingir       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:eingjum      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:eingja       FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:eingirnar    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:eingirnar    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:eingjunum    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:eingjanna    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ongir        FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ongir        FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongjum       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongja        FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ongirnar     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ongirnar     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ongjunum     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:ongjanna     FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv36/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv36 ;
  kv2  ;
!
LEXICON kv36 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv36e ;
  kv_flt2 ;
!
LEXICON kv36e ! støð
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  +N+Fem+Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGf_S ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: FemNom_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>na FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ni FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv37/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv37  ;
  kv2   ;   
   !
LEXICON kv37
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv37e		;
  kv_flt37	;
  !
LEXICON kv37e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:     	   FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>nna     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt37
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ir    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>irnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>irnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>unum  FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>anna  FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv38 ! negl
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2 ;
  +N+Fem+Pl+Nom: DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
  +N+Fem+Pl+Acc: DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
!
LEXICON kv39/22
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv39  ;
  kv22 ;
!
LEXICON kv39 ! slógv
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv39e    ;
  kv_flt39 ;
  !
LEXICON kv39e  
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:ógv DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ógv FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ógv FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:ógv S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt39
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:ógv F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:ógv F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:ógv F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv40 ! trøð
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 kv40e    ;
 kv_flt40 ;
!
LEXICON kv40e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:     DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:     DF_A_SGf_W ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:     DF_D_SGf_W ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt40 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:     F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;
 
 
!! ###  Lexica for Neuter nouns
! __________

LEXICON h1 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** eyga
  h1e    ; ! eyga
  h_flt1 ;
!
LEXICON h1e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGn        ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>a DF_G_SGn_a      ;
!
LEXICON h_flt1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA_u_ur ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG_na    ;
!
LEXICON h1_2 ! setta
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h1_2e    ;
  h_flt1_2 ;
!
LEXICON h1_2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h1e ;
!
LEXICON h_flt1_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA_u_ur ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG	     ;
 !
LEXICON h1_2/1_3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h1_2 ;
 h1_3 ;
!
LEXICON h1_3 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** drama
  h1_3e    ;
  h_flt1_3 ;
!
LEXICON h1_3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>ai DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>ai DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGn        ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ai DF_D_SGn        ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>as Neu_Flag      ;
