src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
ong+CmpNP/None: kv35 ;
trá+CmpNP/None:trá kv37e ;
vág+CmpNP/None:vág kv36/2 ;
LEXICON Nouns
ong: kv35 ;
eplisong:eplis kv35 ;
kálsong:káls kv35 ;
systir:syst kv31 ;
abbasystir:abbasyst kv31 ;
miðlingasystir:miðlingasyst kv31 ;
pápasystir:pápasyst kv31 ;
yvirsjúkrasystir:yvirsjúkrasyst kv31 ;
stórasystir:stórasyst kv31 ;
móðursystir:móðursyst kv31 ;
ommusystir:ommusyst kv31 ;
jólagalla:jóla#gall h1_3 ;
kamera:kamer h1_2/1_3 ;
lemma:lemm h1_2/1_3 ;
kola:kol h1_3 ;
klitika:klitik h1_3 ;
reyðfiskaeyga:reyðfiskaeyg h1 ;
rangeyga:rangeyg h1 ;
nálareyga:nálareyg h1_2 ;
reyvarringseyga:reyvarringseyg h1 ;
narkotika:narkotik h1_2 ;
mokka:mokk h1_3e ;
tequila:tequil h1_3e ;
sjalusidrama:sjalusi#dram h1_2/1_3 ;
panorama:panoram h1_3 ;
forskotsskema:forskotsskem h1_2/1_3 ;
dogma:dogm h1_2/1_3 ;
firma:firm h1_3 ;
nirvana:nirvan h1_3e ;
gehenna:gehenn h1_3e ;
mantra:mantr h1_2/1_3 ;
máloyra:máloyr h1 ;
ólagansoyra:ólagansoyr h1 ;
fimmogtjúguoyra:fimm#og#tjúgu#oyr h1_2 ;
fjarskiftisdata:fjarskiftisdat h1_2/1_3 ;
eista:eist h1 ;
liða:lið h1_2 ;
lokkanoða:lokkanoð h1_2 ;
gjaldoyra:gjaldoyr h1_2 ;
hjáeista:hjá#eist h1 ;
grónnoða:grón#noð h1_2 ;
níggju:níggj h_flt1 ;
fimmu:fimm h_flt1 ;
fimtanur:fimtan h_flt1 ;
tjúgur:tjúgur h_flt1 ;
hálvfemsur:hálvfems h_flt1 ;
hálvfjerðsur:hálvfjerðs h_flt1 ;
tveyur:tvey h_flt1 ;
byrða:byrð kv32_1 ;
skattabyrða:skatta#byrð kv32_1 ;
tarvabyrða:tarva#byrð kv32_1 ;
bakbyrða:bak#byrð kv32_1 ;
skjútsbyrða:skjúts#byrð kv32_1 ;
próvbyrða:próv#byrð kv32_1 ;
olmussuheiðarar:olmussuheiðar kv_flt32 ;
torvheiðar:torvheið kv_flt32 ;
sandoyri:sandoyr kv32 ;
vatnoyri:vatnoyr kv32 ;
frostmýri:frostmýr kv32 ;
lyngheiði:lyngheið kv32 ;
lundabyrði:lundabyrð kv32 ;
beringarbyrði:beringarbyrð kv32 ;
lág:lág kv36 ;
skálkalág:skálka#lág kv36 ;
lortalág:lorta#lág kv36 ;
løgtingslág:løgtings#lág kv36 ;
negl:negl kv38 ;
trøllanegl:trølla#negl kv38 ;
andnegl:and#negl kv38 ;
plógv+CmpNP/None:pl kv39 ;
slógv+CmpNP/None:sl kv39 ;
flá:flá kv37/2 ;
rá+CmpNP/None:rá kv37/2 ;
lá+CmpNP/None:lá kv37/2 ;
gjá+CmpNP/None:gjá kv37 ;
matará:matar#á kv37 ;
skrá:skrá kv37/2 ;
byggiskrá:byggi#skrá kv37/2 ;
luttakaraskrá:lut#takara#skrá kv37 ;
farmaskrá:farma#skrá kv37 ;
ættarskrá:ættar#skrá kv37 ;
vøruskrá:vøru#skrá kv37 ;
grindavág:grinda#vág kv36 ;
kongulvág:kongul#vág kv36 ;
kyrruvág:kyrru#vág kv36 ;
gersimi:gersim kv32 ;
heidni:heidn kv33e/h24e ;
kurteisi:kurteis kv33e/h24e ;
hveiti:hveit kv33e/h24e ;
lambaheiði:lamba#heið kv32 ;
sernámsfrøði:ser#náms#frøði kv33e ;
korngrøði:korn#grøði kv33 ;
grasgrøði:gras#grøði kv33 ;
hjólplógv:hjól#pl kv39 ;
hárógv:há#r kv39/22 ;
hústrú:hús#trú kv37 ;
mansævi:mansævi kv33 ;
gleði:gleði kv33 ;
viðurmøði:viðurmøði kv33 ;
avgrøði:avgrøði kv33 ;
jarðskjálvtafrøði:jarð#skjálvta#frøði kv33 ;
handilsfrøði:handils#frøði kv33 ;
brennivínstrøð:brenni#víns#trøð kv40 ;
kongstrøð:kongs#trøð kv40 ;
leigutrøð:leigu#trøð kv40 ;
peglatrøð:pegla#trøð kv40 ;
rossatrøð:rossa#trøð kv40 ;
neytatrøð:neyta#trøð kv40 ;
rættartrøð:rættar#trøð kv40 ;
rossakraft:rossa#kraft kv34 ;
kraft:kraft kv34 ;
tyngdarkraft:tyngdar#kraft kv34 ;
atdráttarkraft:at#dráttar#kraft kv34 ;
róðurkraft:róður#kraft kv34 ;
fjøðurkraft:fjøður#kraft kv34 ;
lívskraft:lívs#kraft kv34 ;
arbeiðskraft:arbeiðs#kraft kv34 ;
kennisemi:kenni#sem h24e/kv33e ;
leiðisemi:leiði#sem h24e/kv33e ;
ótakksemi:ó#takk#sem h24e/kv33e ;
gagnsemi:gagn#sem h24e/kv33e ;
miskunnsemi:mis#kunn#sem h24e/kv33e ;
keðsemi:keð#sem h24e/kv33e ;
góðsemi:góð#sem h24e/kv33e ;
støð:støð kv36 ;
paprika:paprik h1e ;
prosa:pros h1e ;
alhanda:alhand h1e ;
fyrstadrekka:fyrstadrekk h1e ;
vesturdrekka:vesturdrekk h1e ;
rúsdrekka:rúsdrekk h1e ;
ambra:ambr h1e ;
stigma:stigm h1_3 ;
marijuana:marijuan h1_3 ;
vindvág:vind#vág kv36e ;
vág:vág kv36/2 ;
rógv:r kv39e ;
náttarrógv:náttar#r kv39e ;
órógv:ó#r kv39e ;
megi:megi kv33e ;
drivmegi:driv#megi kv33e ;
armstyrki:arm#styrki kv33e ;
sjáldsemi:sjáld#semi kv34e ;
fyritaksemi:fyri#tak#semi kv34e ;
tolsemi:tol#semi kv34e ;
miskunnsemi:mis#kunn#semi kv34e ;
atfinningarsemi:at#finningar#semi kv34e ;
varsemi:var#semi kv34e ;
reglusemi:reglu#semi kv34e ;
blíðsemi:blíð#semi kv34e ;
væti:væti kv33e ;
fuglafrøði:fugla#frøði kv33e ;
merkingarfrøði:merkingar#frøði kv33e ;
lívfrøði:lív#frøði kv33e ;
erma:erm kv32_1 ;
pufferma:puff#erm kv32_1 ;
halgimannaskrá:halgimannaskrá kv37/2 ;
lønarskrá:lønarskrá kv37/2 ;
